Florida, session 2026, SB912.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 95 96 Section 1.âSection 403.71871, Florida Statutes, is created 97 to read: 98 403.71871âShort title.âSections 403.71871-403.71884 may be 99 cited as the âSafe Battery Collection and Recovery Act.â 100 Section 2.âSection 403.71872, Florida Statutes, is created 101 to read: 102 403.71872âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 403.71871-403.71884, 103 the term: 104 (1)ââBattery-containing productâ means a product that 105 contains or is packaged with a covered battery. The term does 106 not include computers, small-scale servers, computer monitors, 107 printers, fax machines, scanners, televisions, digital video 108 disc players and recorders, video cassette recorders, digital 109 converter boxes, cable receivers, satellite receivers, portable 110 digital music players, or video game consoles. 111 (2)ââBattery stewardship organizationâ or âBSOâ means: 112 (a)âA third-party entity designated by one or more 113 producers to implement an approved battery stewardship plan; or 114 (b)âA group of producers which directly implements an 115 approved battery stewardship plan. 116 (3)ââCovered batteryâ means a portable battery or a medium 117 format battery. The term does not include any of the following: 118 (a)âA battery contained in a medical device as defined in 119 21 U.S.C. s. 321(h) which is not designed or marketed for sale 120 or resale at retail locations for personal use. 121 (b)âA battery that uses free-flowing liquid electrolyte or 122 a product that contains such a battery. 123 (c)âA battery designed to power a motor vehicle, part of a 124 motor vehicle, or a component part of a motor vehicle assembled 125 by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including 126 replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle. 127 (d)âA battery designed to power an off-highway vehicle as 128 defined in s. 261.03(5), part of an off-highway vehicle, or a 129 component of an off-highway vehicle assembled by or for a 130 vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement 131 parts for use in an off-highway vehicle. 132 (e)âA battery used in a product which is not intended or 133 designed to be easily removable from the product. 134 (f)âA battery or battery-containing product recalled for 135 safety reasons. 136 (g)âA battery or battery-containing product offered for 137 resale by a business that, as part of its operations, offers 138 products for resale to other businesses or to consumers. 139 (h)âBatteries or battery materials that are imported into 140 this state after collection and are sold to or managed by 141 collectors, logistics companies, or recyclers for the purpose of 142 end-of-life management. 143 (i)âLead-acid batteries or battery components that weigh 11 144 pounds or more. 145 (4)ââMedium format batteryâ means any of the following: 146 (a)âFor nonrechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs 147 more than 4.4 pounds, but not more than 25 pounds; or 148 (b)âFor rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs more 149 than 11 pounds or that has a rating of more than 300 watt-hours, 150 or both, but weighs not more than 25 pounds or has a rating of 151 less than 2,000 watt-hours. 152 (5)ââPortable batteryâ means any of the following: 153 (a)âFor nonrechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs 154 4.4 pounds or less; or 155 (b)âFor rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs 11 156 pounds or less and has a rating of not more than 300 watt-hours. 157 (6)(a)ââProducerâ means the following person or persons 158 responsible for compliance with requirements under this chapter 159 for a covered battery or battery-containing product sold, 160 offered for sale, or distributed in or into this state: 161 1.âFor covered batteries: 162 a.âIf the battery is sold under the brand of the battery 163 manufacturer, the producer is the person who manufactures the 164 battery; 165 b.âIf the battery is sold under a retail brand or under a 166 brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the 167 producer is the brand owner; 168 c.âIf there is no person to whom sub-subparagraph a. or 169 sub-subparagraph b. applies, the producer is the person who is 170 the licensee of a brand or trademark under which the battery is 171 used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or 172 distributed in or into this state, regardless of whether the 173 trademark is registered in this state; 174 d.âIf there is no person to whom sub-subparagraph a., sub 175 subparagraph b., or sub-subparagraph c. applies, the producer is 176 the person who is the importer of record for importing the 177 battery into the United States for use in a commercial 178 enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or distributes the 179 battery in this state; or 180 e.âIf there is no person to whom sub-subparagraph a., sub 181 subparagraph b., sub-subparagraph c., or sub-subparagraph d. 182 applies or no person with a commercial presence in this state, 183 the producer is the person who first sells, offers for sale, or 184 distributes the battery in or into this state. 185 2.âFor covered battery-containing products: 186 a.âIf the battery-containing product is sold under the 187 brand of the product manufacturer, the producer is the person 188 who manufactures the product; 189 b.âIf the battery-containing product is sold under a retail 190 brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the 191 manufacturer, the producer is the brand owner; 192 c.âIf there is no person to whom sub-subparagraph a. or 193 sub-subparagraph b. applies, the producer is the person who is 194 the licensee of a brand or trademark under which the product is 195 used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or 196 distributed in or into this state, regardless of whether the 197 trademark is registered in this state; 198 d.âIf there is no person described in sub-subparagraph a., 199 sub-subparagraph b., or sub-subparagraph c. within the United 200 States, the producer is the person who is the importer of record 201 for the product into the United States for use in a commercial 202 enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or distributes the 203 product in this state; or 204 e.âIf there is no person described in sub-subparagraph a., 205 sub-subparagraph b., sub-subparagraph c., or sub-subparagraph d. 206 with a commercial presence in this state, the producer is the 207 person who first sells, offers for sale, or distributes the 208 product in or into this state. 209 (b)âA producer does not include any person who only 210 manufactures, sells, offers for sale, distributes, or imports 211 into this state a battery-containing product if the only 212 batteries used by the battery-containing product are supplied by 213 a producer that has joined a registered BSO as the producer for 214 that covered battery under this chapter. Such a producer of 215 covered batteries that are included in a battery-containing 216 product shall provide written certification of that membership 217 in a registered BSO to both the producer of the covered battery 218 containing product and the BSO of which the battery producer is 219 a member. 220 (7)ââRechargeable batteryâ means a battery that contains 221 one or more voltaic or galvanic cells electrically connected to 222 produce electric energy and that is designed to be recharged. 223 (8)ââRecoveryâ means collecting, accumulating, and 224 transporting quantities of covered batteries or battery 225 containing products for the purpose of end-of-life management. 226 (9)(a)ââRecyclingâ means the reprocessing, by means of a 227 manufacturing process, of a used material into a product or a 228 secondary raw material. 229 (b)âThe term does not include: 230 1.âEnergy recovery or energy generation by means of 231 combustion of the used material; 232 2.âUse of the used material as a fuel; 233 3.âUse of the used material as alternative daily cover, 234 meaning material placed on the surface of a landfill at the end 235 of each operating day to prevent such hazards as fires and to 236 manage odors; or 237 4.âLandfill disposal of discarded covered materials. 238 (10)ââRetailerâ means a person or an entity that sells or 239 offers for sale a covered battery in this state or offers or 240 otherwise makes available covered batteries or battery 241 containing products to a customer, including other businesses, 242 in this state. 243 Section 3.âSection 403.71873, Florida Statutes, is created 244 to read: 245 403.71873âRequirements for producers or retailers of 246 covered batteries or battery-containing products; prohibition.â 247 (1)âREQUIREMENTS.â 248 (a)âBeginning January 1, 2028, a producer must do all of 249 the following before selling, offering for sale, or distributing 250 for sale in this state any covered battery or battery-containing 251 product: 252 1.âBe a member of a BSO operating pursuant to a battery 253 stewardship plan approved by the department under s. 403.71874. 254 This subparagraph does not apply to a retailer if the website 255 maintained by the department pursuant to s. 403.71879 lists, as 256 of the date a battery or product is made available for retail 257 sale, the producer or brand of the battery or product in the 258 approved battery stewardship plan. Retailers of covered 259 batteries or battery-containing products are not required to 260 make retail locations available to serve as collection sites for 261 a stewardship program operated by a BSO. Retailers that serve as 262 a collection site may participate in an approved stewardship 263 plan and comply with the requirements for collection sites, 264 consistent with s. 403.71876. 265 2.âProvide verification to the department that the covered 266 battery or the battery in the battery-containing product has 267 labeling or is imprinted with text that identifies the producer 268 of the battery with a clear mark or insignia. 269 (b)âBeginning January 1, 2029, a producer of a covered 270 battery or a battery in a battery-containing product must list 271 the following information on such batteries: 272 1.âThe chemistry of the battery. 273 2.âAn indicator that the battery may not be disposed of as 274 household waste and is not eligible for curbside recycling. 275 276 Subparagraph (a)2. and paragraph (b) do not apply to a battery 277 that can fit entirely, in any orientation, into the small parts 278 cylinder described in 16 C.F.R. s. 1501.4. In this case, the 279 mark required pursuant to subparagraph (a)2. must be placed on 280 the packaging of the battery or battery-containing product. The 281 department may amend by rule the requirements of this subsection 282 to maintain consistency with the labeling requirements or 283 voluntary standards for batteries established in federal law. 284 (2)âPROHIBITION.âA producer, retailer, or BSO may not 285 charge a point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the costs of 286 implementing a battery stewardship plan approved by the 287 department under s. 403.71874. 288 Section 4.âSection 403.71874, Florida Statutes, is created 289 to read: 290 403.71874âBattery stewardship plan components.â 291 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, any BSO operating in this 292 state shall submit a battery stewardship plan, referred to 293 hereafter as âplan,â to the department for review and approval. 294 (2)âA plan must include all of the following: 295 (a)âThe name and contact information of each producer 296 included in the plan. 297 (b)âThe brand of the covered battery or batteries that the 298 BSOâs producer sells, offers for sale, or distributes for sale 299 in this state. All such brands must be listed in the plan. 300 (c)âPerformance goals and processes for achieving such 301 goals. Performance goals must include, but need not be limited 302 to, an education and outreach strategy to enhance consumer 303 awareness of the plan and of the convenience and accessibility 304 of end-of-life management options for covered batteries or 305 batteries in battery-containing products collected pursuant to 306 the plan. 307 (d)âProcesses for providing notice to retailers of the 308 prohibition in s. 403.71873(2). 309 (e)âProcesses for providing collection sites with signage, 310 written materials, and other promotional materials to inform 311 consumers of the available end-of-life management options for 312 covered batteries collected pursuant to the plan. 313 (f)âCollection site safety training procedures that must 314 include, but need not be limited to, all of the following: 315 1.âOperating protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires 316 and response protocols for such events. 317 2.âProtocols for the safe management of damaged or 318 defective batteries. 319 (g)âA detailed budget that equitably distributes plan 320 implementation costs among the members of the BSO. 321 (h)âProcedures and guidelines for covered battery 322 collection which ensure covered battery collection will occur at 323 no cost to consumers on a continuous, convenient, visible, and 324 accessible basis, regardless of the brand or producer of the 325 covered battery. 326 (i)âProcedures and guidelines to govern the execution of s. 327 403.71876. 328 (j)âCriteria for the designation of an entity as a covered 329 battery collection site and the addresses of such designated 330 covered battery collection sites. 331 (k)âThe names of proposed service providers, including 332 sorters, transporters, and processors, to be used for the final 333 disposition of batteries. 334 (l)âProcedures and guidelines to govern how the BSO shall 335 coordinate with material recovery facilities and secondary 336 processors to properly process and transport for end-of-life 337 management any covered batteries improperly sent to such 338 facilities through the waste or recycling streams. 339 (m)âProcedures for recordkeeping, tracking, and documenting 340 the management and disposition of collected covered batteries, 341 including any delay anticipated by the BSO in managing medium 342 format batteries. 343 (3)âAn approved plan is valid for 5 years. A BSO whose plan 344 is approved pursuant to this section shall do all of the 345 following: 346 (a)âSubmit a new plan to the department for approval 1 year 347 before the expiration of the existing approved plan. If the 348 performance goals included in the previously approved plan have 349 not been met, the new plan must include corrective measures that 350 the BSO must implement to meet such performance goals, which may 351 include, but need not be limited to, improvements to the 352 collection site network or increased expenditures dedicated to 353 education and outreach. 354 (b)âSubmit plan amendments to the department for approval. 355 (c)âNotify the department within 90 days after a producer, 356 processor, or transporter begins or ceases participation in the 357 BSO, or within 90 days after the addition or removal of a 358 processor or transporter under the plan. 359 (4)(a)âThe department shall approve, conditionally approve, 360 or deny a plan or plan amendment within 120 days after receiving 361 such proposed plan or proposed plan amendment. 362 (b)âIf the department denies a proposed plan or amendment: 363 1.âThe department must notify the BSO of the denial in 364 writing and provide a rationale describing why the proposed plan 365 or amendment does not comply with this section; 366 2.âThe BSO must submit a revised plan or plan amendment, or 367 notice of plan or plan amendment withdrawal, within 60 days 368 after the denial; and 369 3.âThe department must approve or deny the revised plan or 370 plan amendment within 90 days after resubmittal. The denial of a 371 revised plan or plan amendment may be appealed to the 372 department, and the appeal must be in accordance with chapter 373 120. 374 Section 5.âSection 403.71875, Florida Statutes, is created 375 to read: 376 403.71875âBattery stewardship organization fiscal duties.âA 377 BSO implementing a battery stewardship plan approved under s. 378 403.71874 has all of the following fiscal duties: 379 (1)âResponsibility for all costs associated with 380 implementing the plan. 381 (2)âReimbursement of local governments for demonstrable 382 costs incurred by a local government facility or solid waste 383 facility designated as a collection site under the plan. 384 Reimbursement shall only be for local government and solid waste 385 or recyclables handling facilities that individually collect 386 more than 200 pounds annually. 387 (3)âCollection of charges from participating producers 388 sufficient to cover the costs of implementing the plan, 389 including battery collection, transportation, processing, 390 education and outreach, and program evaluation. 391 Section 6.âSection 403.71876, Florida Statutes, is created 392 to read: 393 403.71876âCollection and management requirements.â 394 (1)âA BSO implementing an approved battery stewardship plan 395 shall do all of the following: 396 (a)âProvide for the collection of all covered batteries, 397 statewide, from any person, regardless of the chemistry or brand 398 of the battery, on a free, continuous, convenient, and 399 accessible basis. 400 (b)âEquip collection sites designated pursuant to s. 401 403.71874(2)(j), at no cost to the sites, with suitable 402 collection containers for covered batteries that are segregated 403 from other solid waste, or provide alternative arrangements for 404 the collection of such batteries at the site. 405 (c)âEnsure that medium format batteries are collected only 406 at household hazardous waste collection sites or other staffed 407 collection sites that meet applicable federal, state, and local 408 requirements for managing medium format batteries. 409 (d)âProvide for the collection of damaged and defective 410 batteries, by persons trained to handle and ship such batteries, 411 at collection sites and at each permanent household hazardous 412 waste facility and each household hazardous waste collection 413 event provided by the department. As used in this paragraph, the 414 term âdamaged and defective batteriesâ means batteries that have 415 been damaged or that have been identified by the manufacturer as 416 being defective for safety reasons and that have the potential 417 to produce a dangerous evolution of heat, fire, or short 418 circuit, as referred to in 49 C.F.R. s. 173.185(f), or as 419 provided by the state by rule to maintain consistency with 420 federal standards. 421 (e)âCoordinate the delivery of services with existing 422 public and private waste collection services and facilities; 423 transporters; consolidators; processors; electronic waste 424 recyclers; other BSOs; retailers if cost-effective, mutually 425 agreeable, and otherwise practical; or other related entities to 426 provide efficient and cost-effective delivery of services. 427 (f)âFor portable batteries, provide all of the following 428 within 3 years after approval of the battery stewardship plan: 429 1.âAt least one permanent collection site within a 15-mile 430 radius for at least 95 percent of state residents; and 431 2.âAt least one permanent collection site, collection 432 service, or collection event for every 30,000 residents of a 433 county. 434 (g)âFor medium format batteries, provide all of the 435 following within 3 years after approval of the battery 436 stewardship plan: 437 1.âAt least 10 permanent collection sites in this state. 438 Such sites must be reasonably dispersed throughout this state; 439 2.âA collection event at least once every 3 years in each 440 county that does not have a permanent collection site, which 441 must provide for the collection of all medium format batteries, 442 including damaged and defective medium format batteries; and 443 3.âAny entity that may be used as a collection site or that 444 will authorize a collection event on its property that satisfies 445 the criteria in this paragraph. 446 (2)âA BSO implementing an approved battery stewardship plan 447 may issue a warning for the suspension or termination of a 448 collection site or service that does not comply with the 449 approved plan or that poses an immediate threat to public health 450 and safety. 451 (3)âA BSO is not required to provide for the collection of 452 batteries, battery-containing products, or covered batteries 453 that remain contained in a battery-containing product at the 454 time of delivery to a collection site or collection event if 455 such batteries or products are under a recall for safety 456 reasons. A BSO may seek reimbursement from the producer of a 457 battery or battery-containing product under recall for safety 458 reasons for the costs incurred in collecting, transporting, or 459 processing such batteries and products. 460 Section 7.âSection 403.71877, Florida Statutes, is created 461 to read: 462 403.71877âBattery stewardship plan implementation.âA BSO 463 implementing an approved battery stewardship plan shall do all 464 of the following to promote the implementation of the plan: 465 (1)âDevelop and maintain a website. 466 (2)âDevelop and place advertisements on social media or 467 other relevant media platforms. 468 (3)âDevelop promotional materials about the plan and the 469 restrictions on disposing of covered batteries. 470 (4)âDevelop and distribute to collection sites collection 471 site safety training procedures to help ensure proper management 472 of covered batteries at collection sites. 473 (5)âProvide to each collection site used under the plan 474 consumer-focused educational materials that are accessible by 475 customers of retailers that sell covered batteries or battery 476 containing products. 477 (6)âProvide safety information related to covered battery 478 collection activities to the operator of each collection site 479 used under the plan, including appropriate protocols to reduce 480 risks of spills or fires, respond to a spill or fire, and manage 481 a collected damaged or defective battery. 482 (7)âProvide educational materials to the operator of each 483 collection site used under the plan for the management of 484 recalled batteries. 485 (8)âUpon request by a retailer or other potential 486 collection site, provide educational materials describing 487 collection opportunities for covered batteries. 488 (9)âCoordinate with other BSOs implementing a battery 489 stewardship plan in providing education and outreach under s. 490 403.71874(2)(c). 491 (10)âConduct a survey, during the first year of 492 implementing a battery stewardship plan and once every 5 years 493 thereafter, of public awareness of the outreach efforts 494 undertaken pursuant to this section. The BSO shall make the 495 results of the surveys available to the department. 496 Section 8.âSection 403.71878, Florida Statutes, is created 497 to read: 498 403.71878âReporting requirements.â 499 (1)âStarting June 1, 2029, and annually thereafter, a BSO 500 implementing an approved battery stewardship plan shall submit a 501 report to the department which includes all of the following: 502 (a)âA summary financial statement documenting the financing 503 of the plan and an analysis of plan costs and expenditures, 504 including an analysis of the planâs expenses, such as 505 collection, transportation, management, education, and 506 administrative overhead. The summary financial statement is 507 sufficiently detailed if it provides transparency regarding 508 funds collected from producers spent on plan implementation, in 509 addition to other necessary financial accounting information. 510 (b)âThe weight, by chemistry, of collected covered 511 batteries. 512 (c)âA list of all facilities used in the processing or 513 disposition of covered batteries under the plan. 514 (d)âFor each facility used for the final disposition of 515 covered batteries under the plan, an overview of how the 516 facility processed or otherwise managed batteries and battery 517 components. 518 (e)âThe weight and chemistry of covered batteries sent to 519 each facility used for the final disposition of batteries. This 520 information may be approximated based on extrapolations of 521 national or regional data for programs in operation in multiple 522 states. 523 (f)âThe estimated aggregate sales, by weight and chemistry, 524 of covered batteries, including covered batteries contained in 525 or packaged with battery-containing products, sold in this state 526 by the BSOâs participating producers for each of the previous 3 527 calendar years. 528 (g)âA summary describing the management and recycling of 529 collected batteries. 530 (h)âA description of education and outreach efforts 531 supporting plan implementation, including: 532 1.âA summary of education and outreach provided to 533 consumers, collection sites, manufacturers, distributors, and 534 retailers to promote the collection and recycling of covered 535 batteries and an analysis of how such education and outreach met 536 the requirements under s. 403.71874(2)(c)2.; 537 2.âSamples of education and outreach materials; 538 3.âA summary of coordinated education and outreach efforts 539 with any other BSOs implementing a battery stewardship plan; 540 4.âA summary of any changes made during the previous 541 calendar year to education and outreach activities; and 542 5.âAn evaluation of the effectiveness of education and 543 outreach activities. 544 (i)âA list of all collection sites used to implement the 545 plan, an address for each listed site, a link to the website of 546 each listed site, if available, and an up-to-date map indicating 547 the location of each site. 548 (j)âA description of methods used to collect, transport, 549 and recycle covered batteries under the plan. 550 (k)âAn analysis of the performance goals under the plan and 551 the rationale describing why performance goals were not met, if 552 applicable. 553 (2)âAfter 4 years of implementation of an approved battery 554 stewardship plan, a BSO or a producer member of such 555 organization shall hire an independent third party to conduct a 556 one-time audit of the battery stewardship plan and plan 557 operation. The auditor shall examine the effectiveness of the 558 battery stewardship plan in collecting and managing covered 559 batteries. The auditor shall also examine the cost-effectiveness 560 of the plan and compare it to the cost-effectiveness of 561 collections plans and programs for covered batteries in other 562 jurisdictions. The BSO shall submit a copy of such audit to the 563 department. 564 Section 9.âSection 403.71879, Florida Statutes, is created 565 to read: 566 403.71879âResponsibilities of the department.âThe 567 department shall include on its website: 568 (1)âA copy of all battery stewardship plans approved under 569 s. 403.71874 and any amendments to such plans; 570 (2)âThe names of producer members covered under an approved 571 battery stewardship plan; 572 (3)âA list of brands of covered batteries covered under 573 approved battery stewardship plans; and 574 (4)âA copy of each annual report submitted to the 575 department pursuant to s. 403.71878. 576 Section 10.âSection 403.71881, Florida Statutes, is created 577 to read: 578 403.71881âAntitrust.âA producer, retailer, or BSO is not 579 liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust laws or laws 580 relating to fraudulent, deceptive, or unfair methods of 581 competition or trade practices arising from conduct that 582 complies with an approved battery stewardship plan. 583 Section 11.âSection 403.71882, Florida Statutes, is created 584 to read: 585 403.71882âCollection of batteries independent of a battery 586 stewardship plan.â 587 (1)âA person or recycler may offer or perform fee-based 588 household battery collection services or mail-back services for 589 covered batteries in this state independently of a BSO if: 590 (a)âThe services are performed and facilities are operated 591 in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws 592 and requirements; 593 (b)âThe person or recycler accepts all covered batteries; 594 and 595 (c)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), all batteries 596 collected by the person or recycler from customers in this state 597 are provided to a BSO implementing an approved battery 598 stewardship plan. After providing collected batteries to a BSO, 599 any transport and processing of such batteries by the BSO must 600 be done at the BSOâs expense. A BSO may refuse to accept 601 batteries from any such person or recycler if the department is 602 notified of the reason for such refusal. 603 (2)âA person or recycler described in subsection (1) may 604 recycle covered batteries collected from customers in this state 605 if such person or recycler provides annual collection data and 606 recycling data to the department. Such data must include all of 607 the following: 608 (a)âThe weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries 609 collected. 610 (b)âA description of how each facility recycled or 611 otherwise managed batteries and battery components for the final 612 disposition of covered batteries. 613 (3)âSuch person or recycler may not receive compensation 614 from a BSO for any batteries collected, transported, or recycled 615 under this section, unless otherwise agreed. 616 Section 12.âSection 403.71883, Florida Statutes, is created 617 to read: 618 403.71883âGeneral battery disposal and collection 619 requirements.â 620 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2028, all of the following shall 621 apply: 622 (a)âA person may dispose of a covered battery only by 623 delivery to a collection site or collection event operated under 624 an approved battery stewardship plan or operated by an 625 independent collector, unless the battery is regulated as 626 hazardous waste. 627 (b)âA person may not knowingly cause or allow the mixing of 628 a covered battery with recyclable materials that are intended 629 for processing and sorting at a material recovery facility 630 without documenting the contents in the shipment manifest, the 631 approval of the receiving party, and the approval of the 632 transporting party. 633 (c)âA person may not knowingly cause or allow the mixing of 634 a covered battery with municipal waste that is intended for 635 disposal at a landfill. 636 (d)âA person may not knowingly cause or allow the disposal 637 of a covered battery in a landfill. 638 (e)âA person may not knowingly cause or allow the mixing of 639 a covered battery with waste that is intended for burning or 640 incineration without documenting contents in the shipment 641 manifest, the approval of the receiving party, and the approval 642 of the transporting party. 643 (2)âAn owner or operator of a solid waste facility may not 644 be found in violation of this act if the facility has posted in 645 a conspicuous location a sign stating that covered batteries 646 must be managed through collection sites established by a BSO 647 and are not accepted for disposal. 648 (3)âA solid waste collector is not in violation of this act 649 for a covered battery placed in a disposal container by a 650 person. 651 (4)âA BSO may not refuse to accept covered batteries 652 inadvertently received by a recycling or solid waste facility if 653 the batteries are properly packaged, unless the BSO properly 654 notifies the department. 655 Section 13.âSection 403.71884, Florida Statutes, is created 656 to read: 657 403.71884âPenalties.â 658 (1)âPENALTIES.â 659 (a)âA person who violates this act shall be subject to a 660 civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation. 661 (b)âA person who knowingly makes a false material statement 662 to the department related to a battery stewardship plan 663 submitted pursuant to s. 403.71874 commits a felony of the third 664 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 665 775.084. 666 (c)âThe Attorney General or the county attorney of any 667 county in which a violation of the act occurs may, in addition 668 to any other penalty, bring an action to enjoin any person from 669 violating this act. 670 (2)âCIVIL ACTION.â 671 (a)âA BSO implementing an approved battery stewardship plan 672 may bring a civil action or actions to recover costs and 673 damages, as specified in this section, from a producer who sells 674 or otherwise makes available in this state covered batteries or 675 battery-containing products not included under an approved plan 676 in violation of the requirements of this act. An action under 677 this subsection may be brought against one or more defendants. 678 An action under this subsection may be brought against a 679 defendant producer only if the BSO incurs costs in this state, 680 including legal fees and expenses and reasonable incremental 681 administrative and program promotional costs, in excess of 682 $1,000 to collect, transport, and recycle or otherwise dispose 683 of the covered batteries or battery-containing products of a 684 nonparticipating producer. 685 (b)âA BSO implementing an approved battery stewardship plan 686 may bring a civil action against a producer of a recalled 687 battery to recover costs associated with handling the recalled 688 battery, including legal fees and expenses. 689 (c)âA BSO implementing an approved battery stewardship plan 690 may bring a civil action against another BSO that underperforms 691 on its battery collection obligations under this act by failing 692 to collect and provide for the end-of-life management of 693 batteries in an amount roughly equivalent to costs imposed on 694 the plaintiff BSO by virtue of the failures of the defendant 695 BSO, plus legal fees and expenses. 696 Section 14.âSection 403.7192, Florida Statutes, is 697 repealed. 698 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.